Hawaii statutes.
[§78-3.6 Experimental modernization
projects; county boards of water supply.] It is the intent of this section
to encourage and facilitate improvements in the human resource programs of
qualifying boards of water supply. With or without the approval from the chief
executive, the director of any qualifying board of water supply may conduct
experimental modernization projects to determine whether specific changes in
its human resource program would result in a more desirable program for the
jurisdiction.

Prior to the implementation of any experimental
modernization project, the director of any qualifying board of water supply
shall:

(1) Develop a plan identifying:

(A) The purpose of the project;

(B) The methodology to be used;

(C) The duration of the project;

(D) The criteria for evaluation of the
project; and

(E) The cost of the project, if any; and

(2) Consult and negotiate with the exclusive
representative if a modification or waiver of any provision in a collective
bargaining agreement, including any new provision, is necessary to conduct the
project.

The representative of the qualifying board of
water supply and the exclusive representative shall mutually agree in writing
to any modification, waiver, or new provision before the project is implemented.

While the board of water supply project is in
progress, it shall not be limited by state or local personnel laws and rules,
but shall be in compliance with all equal employment opportunity laws, laws
prohibiting discrimination, and chapter 89.

For purposes of this section, "qualifying
board of water supply" means any county board of water supply serving a
population of 500,000 or more persons. [L 2003, c 40, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next